Washington statutes.
RCW 36.43.020

Area to which applicable.

The building codes or fire regulations when adopted by the board of county commissioners shall be applicable to all the area of the county situated outside the corporate limits of any city or town, or to such portion thereof as may be prescribed in such building code or fire regulation.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.43.020. Prior: 1943 c 204 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 4077-11.]